test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-list_id_gt-norm.gen.yaml
    šovâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: šoovvât
    čođoliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čođđool
    čođâldittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čođâlditám
    čođâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čođâttâm
    čođâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čoođât
    špiäiguttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: špiäigut
    špuáhuttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: špuáhut
    špuákkárittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: špuákkáritám
    špuákkááttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: špuákkááttâm
    čuhâliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čuuhâl
    čuiniđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čuiniim
    čuiniđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čuinee
    čujottiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čuujoot
    čulgâdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čulgâd
    čulliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čulliim
    čulliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čollee
    šumbârdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: šuumbârd
    čummiittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čummit
    šumpârdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: šuumpârd
    čuoccuuttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čuoccut
    čuoggiistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čuoggist
    čuoggiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čuoggiim
    čuoggiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čyeggee
    čuoigâdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čuoigâd
    čuoigâlittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čuoigâlitám
    čuoigâlittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čuoigâlit
    čuoigâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čuoigât
    čuojâldittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čuojâlditám
    čuojâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čuojât
    čuoldâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čuoldâst
    čuolâliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čuollâl
    čuolâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čuolâst
    čuolâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čuolât
    čuommiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čuommiim
    čuomâstittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čuomâstit
    čuomâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čuomâst
    čuopâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čuopât
    čuorgiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čuorgiim
    čuorgiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čyergee
    čuormâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čuormâst
    čuorviđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čuorviim
    čuorviđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čyervee
    čuovrijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čuovrijd
    čuovviđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čuovviim
    čuovviđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čyevvee
    čuovâniđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čuovvân
    čuovâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čuovât
    čuožâstittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čuožâstitám
    čuožâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čuožžâst
    čuožžiittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čuožžit
    čurgiistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čurgist
    čurgiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čurgiim
    čurgiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čorgee
    šurijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: šuurijd
    čurmâdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čurmâd
    čurttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čurttiim
    čurttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čurttee
    šuvettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: šuvveet
    šuvijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: šuuvijd
    čuággiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čuágám
    čuággiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čuággá
    čuágudiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čuággud
    šuáhkádiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: šuáhkád
    šuáhášiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: šuáháš
    čuájustiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čuájust
    čuájádiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čuájáád
    čuákkimistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čuákkimistám
    šuámbistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: šuámbist
    čuárbudiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čuárbud
    čuárbášiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čuárbáš
    čuárgudiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čuárgud
    čuárvuttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čuárvut
    čuávdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čuávdám
    čuávdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čoovdij
    čuávdásiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čuávdás
    šuávhudiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: šuávhud
    čuávudiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čuávud
    čuávuliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čuávvul
    čuávuttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čuávut
    šuávuttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: šuávvut
    čuážudiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čuážžud
    čuážuttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čuážžut
    šuđijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: šuuđijd
    čučârdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čuuččârd
    čyecciđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čuácá
    šyehkistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: šyehkist
    šyehkiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: šuáhkám
    šyeimidiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: šyeimid
    čyeldiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čuáldám
    čyerbidiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čyerbid
    čyevittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čyevvit
    šyevittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: šyevvit
    čyežittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čyežžit
    čáhániđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čáhháán
    čájádittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čájáditám
    čájádiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čááijád
    čápudiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čááppud
    čárvudiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čáárvud
    čäittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čááitám
    čälittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čäälit
    šämittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: šäämit
    šävittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: šäävit
    čäälliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čálám
